Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.240

Regulation of financial transactions—Limitations.

A county or governmental entity subject to this title may not regulate the terms, conditions, or disclosures of any lawful financial transaction between a consumer and (1) a business or professional under the jurisdiction of the department of financial institutions, or (2) any financial institution as defined under *RCW 30.22.041.

[ 2005 c 338 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.22.041 was recodified as RCW 30A.22.041 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

Finding—Intent—2005 c 338: See note following RCW 35.21.698.